src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_VV_Prefix=NI_Order=Ind_Endings
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj:siiminaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj:siimin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+ExclSubj:siiminaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+ExclSubj:minaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj:min EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj:minaaban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V                                      !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary
0:%>%> VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj            !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2PlSubj:siiwegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj:siinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProxSubj:siiwaagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj:siiwaangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+InclSubj:siiwangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2PlSubj:siiwegibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObvSubj:siinigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:siiwaagobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+ExclSubj:siiwaangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+InclSubj:siiwangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2PlSubj:siweg EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:sinig EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj:sigwaa EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj:siwaang EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+InclSubj:siwang EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2PlSubj:siwegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj:sinigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProxSubj:sigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+ExclSubj:siwaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+InclSubj:siwangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2PlSubj:wegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj:nigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProxSubj:waagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+ExclSubj:waangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+InclSubj:wangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2PlSubj:wegibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObvSubj:nigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:waagobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+ExclSubj:waangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+InclSubj:wangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj:yeg EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj:nid EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj:waad EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj:yaang EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj:yang EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj:ying EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj:yegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj:nipan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj:waapan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj:yaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:yangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:yangoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:yingoban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=GI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Flags_Prefix=GI
@U.Order.Ind@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Prefix=GI_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V, Prefix: GI, Order: Ind              !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Prefix=GI_Order=Ind_Endings
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+2PlSubj:siimwaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+InclSubj:siiminaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+2PlSubj:siim EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+InclSubj:siimin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+2PlSubj:siimwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+InclSubj:siiminaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+2PlSubj:mwaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+InclSubj:minaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj:m EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+InclSubj:min EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj:mwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:minaaban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_V, Prefix: NONE, Order: Ind            !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Stems
aayaamiwag:aayaami VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
aayaanikoobiwag:aayaanikoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ayaakowaakoziwag:ayaakowaakozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ayaanigokwadeziwag:ayaanigokwadezi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ayaanzigweshimowag:ayaanzigweshimo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ayindanakamigiziwag:ayindanakamigizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
baatayiinoobiwag:baatayiinoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
baatayiinwewaanagiziwag:baatayiinwewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
babiisiminagiziwag:babiisiminagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
babiiwigiziwag:babiiwigizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
babiiwizhiinyiwag:babiiwizhiinyi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
bangiishenhwagiziwag:bangiishenhwagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
bebakaaniziwag:bebakaanizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
biiwigaabawiwag:biiwigaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
bimoodewagiziwag:bimoodewagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dashiwag:dashi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dasoobiwag:dasoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
dasoonagiziwag:dasoonagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
daswaabaminaagoziwag:daswaabaminaagozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
gagaanominagiziwag:gagaanominagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
gagaanwaakoziwag:gagaanwaakozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
giiwitaabiwag:giiwitaabi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ingodoonzhaanagiziwag:ingodoonzhaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ingodwaasodaabaanagiziwag:ingodwaasodaabaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ingodwaaswewaanagiziwag:ingodwaaswewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ishwaasogamigiziwag:ishwaasogamigizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
izhiinowag:izhiino VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
maamawiinowag:maamawiino VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
maawandoobiwag:maawandoobi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mamaachaakizowag:mamaachaakizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mamaandidowag:mamaandido VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mamichiigiziwag:mamichiigizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
mangigaabawiwag:mangigaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
midaasogamigiziwag:midaasogamigizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
midaasoonagiziwag:midaasoonagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
miziwegomowag:miziwegomo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naananiwag:naanani VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naanonaagoziwag:naanonaagozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
naanoopizowag:naanoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nenaaniwag:nenaani VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
neniizhoobizowag:neniizhoobizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nenisiwag:nenisi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niibide'owag:niibide'o VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niibidegomowag:niibidegomo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niibideyaabanigoziwag:niibideyaabanigozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiwewaanagiziwag:niiwewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiyodaabaanagiziwag:niiyodaabaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiyoobizowag:niiyoobizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niiyotaagoziwag:niiyotaagozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhogamigiziwag:niizhogamigizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhoodemowag:niizhoodemo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhoogomowag:niizhoogomo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhoopizowag:niizhoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhooyaadagaakowag:niizhooyaadagaako VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhwaasodaabaanagiziwag:niizhwaasodaabaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhwaasoogaabawiwag:niizhwaasoogaabawi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niizhwaaswewaanagiziwag:niizhwaaswewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ningodwaachiwag:ningodwaachi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
ningodwaasoopizowag:ningodwaasoopizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nishwaasonaagoziwag:nishwaasonaagozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nishwaasotaagoziwag:nishwaasotaagozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nisodaabaanagiziwag:nisodaabaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nisoobizowag:nisoobizo VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
nisoonagiziwag:nisoonagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
niswewaanagiziwag:niswewaanagizi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
okwabiwag:okwabi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
owiinzhishiwag:owiinzhishi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
wawaawiyezwag:wawaawiyezi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
zhaangachiwag:zhaangachi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
zhaangasotaagoziwag:zhaangasotaagozi VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_V_Boundary ;
